Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7997.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 169
RECOGNITION OF NATIVE AMERICAN TRIBES
42-169-1. Seaconke Wampanoag tribe.
(a) The State of Rhode Island officially recognizes the Seaconke Wampanoag tribe as a
Native American Indian tribe for the limited purpose of assisting this tribe in establishing eligibility
for federal education, job training, and housing benefits and federal protection for the sale of
artwork; qualifying for public and private grants for which Indian tribes or groups, or members
thereof, may be eligible; protecting the ability of this tribe and their members to engage in
traditional religious practices and ceremonies; preserving and protecting burial sites and artifacts;
and ensuring that handicrafts made by tribal members may be sold as "Indian made."
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or interpreted as conferring recognition for
any purpose except as expressly stated in subsection (a) of this section, or as evidence that a tribe
has a state compact or state approval for the purposes of the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act,
25 U.S.C. ch. 29 § 2701 et seq. The limited state recognition accorded to this tribe named in
subsection (a) of this section, shall not be construed to affect in any way a tribe's or group's case
for federal recognition, shall not confer the right of any tribe, group or individual to conduct

gambling of any kind or to engage in the sale of motor fuels or tobacco and shall not constitute an
acknowledgement of any claim by any tribe, group, or individual to any ancestral, tribal or other
public or private lands.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005405
========
LC005405 - Page 2 of 3